Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1554
Department; jobs for unemployed; design programs; grant funds.

In order to provide employment and to establish litter free areas, the department may design programs and grant funds for the use of unemployed persons on a seasonal and part-time basis. In designing such programs, the department shall cooperate and coordinate with federal, other governmental, and private programs aimed at providing jobs for the unemployed.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 21.
October 30, 2020